District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

35-405

Alternate provisions for insurance coverage; blanket policy for more than one vehicle; sinking fund in lieu of insurance; conditions for creation and maintenance of sinking fund; proof of financial responsibility; admission of liability by owner for tortious acts of drivers of vehicles; sinking fund exempt from attachment or levy for other obligations of depositor.

Repealed.

June 29, 1938, ch. 809, § 5
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 953, Pub. L. 85-792,§ 2
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(a), 33 DCR 703

History

1981 Ed., § 44-305.
1973 Ed., § 44-305.

Prior Codifications